sv: Rullväska – hjulkonfiguration: 2 in-line-hjul; 4 in-line-hjul; Inga hjul; Spinner 4 hjul; Övrigt
sl-SI: Konfiguracija koles prenosnega kovčka: 2 kolesi v vrsti; 4 kolesa v vrsti; Brez koles; 4 vrtljiva kolesa; Drugo
bg-BG: Конфигурация на колелата на чантата с колела: 2 редови колелца; 4 редови колелца; Без колелца; 4 въртящи се колелца; Друго
es: Configuración de la rueda de la caja rodante: 2 ruedas en línea; 4 ruedas en línea; Sin ruedas; 4 ruedas giratorias; Otro
zh-CN: 拉杆箱轮组配置: 2 个直排轮; 4 个直排轮; 无轮; 4 个万向轮; 其他
zh-TW: 滾輪式保護箱輪子配置: 2 個直排輪; 4 個直排輪; 無輪子; 4 個萬向輪; 其他
it: Configurazione delle ruote della custodia con rotelle: 2 ruote in linea; 4 ruote in linea; Senza ruote; Spinner a 4 ruote; Altro
cs: Provedení kolečka pro pouzdro na kolečkách: 2 in-line kolečka; 4 in-line kolečka; Bez koleček; 4 rotační kolečka; Jiné
en: Rolling case wheel configuration: 2 in-line wheels; 4 in-line wheels; No wheels; Spinner 4 wheels; Other
fi: Rullaavan kotelon rullakonfiguraatio: 2 peräkkäistä pyörää; 4 peräkkäistä pyörää; Ei pyöriä; 4 pyörivää pyörää; Muu
el: Διάταξη τροχών τροχήλατης θήκης: 2 ευθυγραμμισμένα ροδάκια; 4 ευθυγραμμισμένα ροδάκια; Χωρίς ροδάκια; 4 περιστρεφόμενα ροδάκια; Άλλο
da: Rullekasses hjulkonfiguration: 2 in-line hjul; 4 in-line hjul; Ingen hjul; Spinner med 4 hjul; Andet
lt-LT: Riedančio dėklo ratukų konfigūracija: 2 vienos eilės ratukai; 4 vienos eilės ratukai; Be ratukų; 4 besisukantys ratukai; Kita
pt-BR: Case com rodinhas configuração das rodas: 2 rodas em linha; 4 rodas em linha; Sem rodas; 4 rodas giratórias; Outra
hu: Gurulós tok kerékelrendezése: 2 fix kerék; 4 egysoros kerék; Kerekek nélkül; 4 bolygókerék; Egyéb
pl: Konfiguracja kółek futerału na kółkach: 2 kółka w rzędzie (in-line); 4 kółka w rzędzie (in-line); Bez kółek; Obrotowe (4 kółka); Inne
nl: Rollende case wielconfiguratie: 2 in-line wielen; 4 in-line wielen; Geen wielen; Spinner (4 wielen); Overige
ko: 롤링 케이스 휠 구성: 인라인 휠 2개; 인라인 휠 4개; 휠 없음; 스피너 휠 4개; 기타
de: Radkonfiguration von Rollkoffern: 2 Inline-Rollen; 4 Inline-Rollen; Keine Rollen; 4 Spinner-Rollen; Sonstige
ja: ローリングケースホイール構成: インラインホイール 2 輪; インラインホイール 4 輪; 車輪なし; スピナーホイール 4 輪; その他
ru: Конфигурация колес кейса на колесах: 2 встроенных колеса; 4 встроенных колеса; Без колес; 4 поворотных колеса; Другое
hr-HR: Konfiguracija kotača za kotrljanje kućišta: 2 linijska kotačića; 4 linijska kotačića; Bez kotačića; 4 okretna kotačića; Ostalo
vi: Cấu hình bánh xe vali kéo: 2 bánh thẳng hàng; 4 bánh thẳng hàng; Không có bánh xe; 4 bánh xoay đa chiều; Khác
fr: Configuration des roues de l’étui à roulettes: 2 roues alignées; 4 roues alignées; Sans roulettes; 4 roues pivotantes; Autre
pt-PT: Configuração das rodas da mala com rodas: 2 rodas em linha; 4 rodas em linha; Sem rodas; 4 rodas giratórias; Outro
tr: Tekerlekli kılıf tekerlek konfigürasyonu: 2 sıralı tekerlek; 4 sıralı tekerlek; Tekerleksiz; Dönen 4 tekerlek; Diğer
th: การกำหนดค่าล้อเคสกลิ้ง: ล้ออินไลน์ 2 ล้อ; ล้ออินไลน์ 4 ล้อ; ไม่มีล้อ; ล้อหมุนอิสระ 4 ล้อ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Konfigurácie kolies puzdra na kolieskach: 2 in-line kolieska; 4 in-line kolieska; Bez koliesok; 4 otočné kolieska; Iné
ro-RO: Configurația roților tocului cu rotile: 2 roți în linie; 4 roți în linie; Fără roți; Spinner 4 roți; Altele
nb: Hjulkonfigurasjon for trillekoffert: 2 in-line-hjul; 4 in-line-hjul; Ingen hjul; 4 spinner-hjul; Annet